Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2671.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2308(a) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 2308. Unlawful devices and methods.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in this title, it is unlawful for any person to hunt or aid, abet, assist or conspire to hunt any game or wildlife through the use of:* * *(9.2) A device or method that involves the beating of game or wildlife.* * *Section 2. Section 2741(b) of Title 34 is amended to read:12345678910111213141516171819 § 2741. Denial or revocation of licenses.* * *(b) Violations.--In addition to any penalty and costs imposed by this title, the commission may revoke any hunting or furtaking license and deny any person the privilege to secure a license or to hunt or take furbearers anywhere in this Commonwealth, with or without a license, if the licensee or person:(1) Has either been convicted or signed an acknowledgment of guilt of violating any of the provisions of this title for such periods as are specified in this subchapter.(2) Has been accused of having violated any of the following provisions even though such person has not been convicted of a violation of these sections:(i) Section 2308(a)(9.2) (relating to unlawful devices and methods).(ii) Section 2501 (relating to hunting or furtaking prohibited while under influence of alcohol or controlled substance).(iii) Section 2505 (relating to safety zones).(iv) Section 2509 (relating to damage to property).(v) Section 2522 (relating to shooting at or causing injury to human beings).(vi) Section 2523 (relating to rendering assistance after incidents).(3) Has been convicted of, pleaded guilty to or entered a plea of nolo contendere to a violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 5534 (relating to aggravated cruelty to animal) or a similar offense in another state.20260HB2671PN3710 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 3. Section 2742 of Title 34 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2742. Period of revocation.* * *(d) Revocation of privilege.--N otwithstanding the other provisions of this section, the commission may, for a period determined by the commission, deny the privilege to hunt or take wildlife anywhere in this Commonwealth, with or without a license, to:(1) Any person described in section 2741(b)(2)(i) or (3) (relating to denial or revocation of licenses).(2) Any person convicted or having signed an acknowledgment of guilt of a first or subsequent offense under section 2308(a)(9.2) (relating to unlawful devices and methods).Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2671PN3710 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617